South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S336.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 2-19-90 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 2-19-90. The General Assembly shall meet in joint session for the election of judges on the first Wednesday of March at noon in the House of Representatives.  The date and time for the joint session shall be set by concurrent resolution upon the recommendation of the Judicial Merit Selection Commission.  The Chairman of the Judicial Merit Selection Commission shall announce the commission's nominees for each judicial race, and no further nominating or seconding speeches shall be allowed by members of the General Assembly.  In order to be elected, a candidate must receive a majority of the vote of the members of the General Assembly voting in joint session. SECTION 2.  Section 2-19-80(E) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (E) A period of at least twenty-two days must elapse between the date of the commission's nominations to the General Assembly and The commission must formally release its report as to the qualifications of its nominees to the General Assembly not less than twenty-three days before the date the General Assembly conducts the election for these judgeships. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect on July 1, 2025. ----XX----